src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON INDEFINITE-PRON-IN-POVSJ
кие-повсь+Pron+Indef:ки KATI-KI_INFL ;
мезе-повсь+Pron+Indef:ме PRON-INDEF_MEZE-BDI/POVSJ ;
кона-повсь+Pron+Indef:кона KATI-KONA_INFL ;
кодама-повсь+Det+Indef:кодам%{АОØ%} DET-INDEF_PINGE ;

LEXICON INDEFINITE-PRON-IN-VOK
мезевок+Pron+Indef:ме PRON-INDEF_MEZEVOK ;
кивок+Pron+Indef:ки PRON-INDEF_FOR-KIVOK  "joku; kukaan" ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_FOR-KIVOK
+Pl+Nom:%>т%>ка ENDLEX ;
!+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тненди ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>т%>не%>нь»ге ENDLEX ;
!+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне ENDLEX ;

+Sg+Nom:»вок ENDLEX ;
!+Sg+Nom:е ENDLEX ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>есь ENDLEX ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ти ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ть»ке ENDLEX ;

+SP+Abl:%>до»вок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl:%>до»нга ENDLEX ;
!+SP+Cau:%>нкса ENDLEX ;

+SP+Dat:%>нди»вок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Use/NG:%>нди»ге ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Use/NG:%>нди»нге ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen:%>нь»ге ENDLEX ;
!+SP+Ine:%>са ENDLEX ;
!+SP+Tra:%>кс ENDLEX ;
! DER/COP ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Nom+Def:%>нне%>сь»ке ENDLEX ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нне%>ть»ке ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нне%>ти ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Pl+Nom+Def:%>нне%>т%>не ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Pl+Gen+Def:%>нне%>т%>не%>нь ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Pl+Dat+Def:%>нне%>т%>не%>нди ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>нне ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ннет ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Abl:%>нне%>да ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Cau:%>нне%>нкса ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Ela:%>нне%>ста ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Ill:%>нне%>с ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Ine:%>нне%>са ENDLEX ;
!+Der/Poss+SP+Tra:%>нне%>кс ENDLEX ;




LEXICON KATI-KI_INFL
+Pl+Nom:%>т INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom: INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom:е INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>есь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ти INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl:%>да INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Cau:%>нкса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat:%>нди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine:%>са INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Tra:%>кс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
 DER/COP ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ннесь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ннеть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ннети INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ннетне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ннетнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ннетненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>нне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ннет INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Der/Poss+SP+Abl:%>нне%>да INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+SP+Cau:%>нне%>нкса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+SP+Ela:%>нне%>ста INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+SP+Ill:%>нне%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+SP+Ine:%>нне%>са INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Poss+SP+Tra:%>нне%>кс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;



LEXICON KATI-KONA_INFL
+SP+Cmpr:%>шка INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Shka+SP+Abl:%>шкада INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Shka+SP+Ela:%>шкаста INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Shka+SP+Ill:%>шкас INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Shka+SP+Ine:%>шкаса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der/Shka+SP+Prl:%>шкава INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Cmpr+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg3:%>шкаль INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>нди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:%>нцты INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>нц INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>ц INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;


!LEXICON PRON-INDEF
!+Indef: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MEZE-BDI/POVSJ
+Sg+Nom:зе INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom:зь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:зсь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:зезе INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:зце INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:зец INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Nom+PxPl1:зеньке INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Nom+PxPl2:зенть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Nom+PxPl3:зьсн%{АО%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom:сть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:стне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:зне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:стне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:зенз%{АО%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Gen+Def:зть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen:%>зень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:зезень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:зцень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:зенц INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+PxPl1:зеньконь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+PxPl2:зентень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Gen+PxPl3:зьснон INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:стнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:знень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:стнень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:зензон INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Dat+Def:зти INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat:%>зенди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:зезти INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:зезенди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:зцти INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:зенцты INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+PxPl1:зеньконды INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+PxPl2:зентенди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Dat+PxPl3:зьснонды INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:стненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg1:зненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg2:стненди INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg3:зензонды INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+SP+Abe:%>зьфтома INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Abl:зьда INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Cau:зенкса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Cmpr:%>зешка INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ela:%>зеста INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ela:%>зьста INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ill:зьс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ill:%>зес INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine:%>зеса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Ine:зьса INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Prl:%>зева INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Tra:%>зекс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+SP+Tra:%>зькс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Der+Der/Dimin+SP+Abl:зняда INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+Pl+Nom:знят INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:зняц INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;


LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MEZEVOK
@R.INDEF.VOK@ PRON-INDEF_MEZEVOK-NB/CASE/DEF ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF_MEZEVOK-NB/CASE/DEF
+Sg+Nom+Indef:зевок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Nom+Indef:зьге ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:зьцевок ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:зеньковок ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:зентевок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:зьсновок ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:зьснонга ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:зтивок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abe+Indef:%>зьфтомовок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Abl+Indef:%>зьдевок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Abl+Indef:%>зьдовок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>зьдонга ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Cau+Indef:зенксовок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Cau+Indef:зенксонга ENDLEX ;
+SP+Cmpr+Indef:%>зешкавок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Dat+Indef:%>зендивок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>зендинге ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Ela+Indef:%>зестовок ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Ela+Indef:%>зьстовок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ela+Indef:%>зьстонга ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>зеньге ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:%>зеска ENDLEX ;
+Use/NG+SP+Ine+Indef:%>зьсовок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:%>зьсонга ENDLEX ;
+SP+Prl+Indef:%>зевавок ENDLEX ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:%>зекска ENDLEX ;
+Der/Dimin+Sg+Gen+Def:%>знятьке ENDLEX ;



LEXICON PRON_QNT_SEMBE
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl+Indef:%>д%{АО%} K_НГА ;
+SP+Cau+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нкса ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нди ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:%>с%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ти K_вок ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь ENDLEX ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%^Е2О%>сь ENDLEX ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL3 ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
сембе+Pron:семб%{ЕО%} PRON_QNT_SEMBE ;
